Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-828
Search for weapons; when authorized.

Where the circumstances reasonably indicate to an officer of the law that a search of an individual for weapons is indicated in order to protect the life of such officer such search for weapons may lawfully be made.

Laws 1963, c. 156, § 1, p. 556.